Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
C. Subsequent Acquisition of Shares by Shareholders and Corporation

§ 17-16-630.
Shareholders' preemptive rights.

The shareholders of a corporation do not have a preemptive right to acquire the corporation’s unissued shares except to the extent the articles of incorporation so provide.

A statement included in the articles of incorporation that “the corporation elects to have preemptive rights,” or words of similar import, means that the following principles apply except to the extent the articles of incorporation expressly provide otherwise:

The shareholders of the corporation have a preemptive right, granted on uniform terms and conditions prescribed by the board of directors to provide a fair and reasonable opportunity to exercise the right, to acquire proportional amounts of the corporation’s unissued shares upon the decision of the board of directors to issue them;

A shareholder may waive his preemptive right. A waiver evidenced by a writing is irrevocable even though it is not supported by consideration;

There is no preemptive right with respect to:

Shares issued as compensation to directors, officers, agents, or employees of the corporation, its subsidiaries or affiliates;

Shares issued to satisfy conversion or option rights created to provide compensation to directors, officers, agents, or employees of the corporation, its subsidiaries or affiliates;

Shares authorized in articles of incorporation that are issued within six (6) months from the effective date of incorporation; or

Shares sold otherwise than for money.

Holders of shares of any class without general voting rights but with preferential rights to distributions or assets have no preemptive rights with respect to shares of any class;

Holders of shares of any class with general voting rights but without preferential rights to distributions or assets have no preemptive rights with respect to shares of any class with preferential rights to distributions or assets unless the shares with preferential rights are convertible into or carry a right to subscribe for or acquire shares without preferential rights;

Shares subject to preemptive rights that are not acquired by shareholders may be issued to any person for a period of one (1) year after being offered to shareholders at a consideration set by the board of directors that is not lower than the consideration set for the exercise of preemptive rights. An offer at a lower consideration or after the expiration of one (1) year is subject to the shareholders’ preemptive rights.

For purposes of this section, “shares” includes a security convertible into or carrying a right to subscribe for or acquire shares.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of provisions giving corporation or stockholders prior right of purchase, 2 ALR2d 745.

§ 17-16-631.
Corporation's acquisition of its own shares.

A corporation may acquire its own shares and shares so acquired constitute authorized but unissued shares.

If the articles of incorporation prohibit the reissue of the acquired shares, the number of authorized shares is reduced by the number of shares acquired.

The board of directors may adopt articles of amendment effecting the provisions of this section under article 10 of this act without shareholder action and deliver them to the secretary of state for filing.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “effective upon amendment of the articles of incorporation” at the end of (b); rewrote (c) prescribing how the articles of amendment shall be set forth; and made stylistic changes.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights of creditors of corporation with respect to its purchase or acquisition of its own stock, 47 ALR2d 758.

Validity, construction and effect of provisions of articles of incorporation or stock certificates relating to call, redemption or retirement of common stock, 48 ALR2d 392.

Duty and liability of closely held corporation, its directors, officers or majority stockholders, in acquiring stock of minority shareholder, 7 ALR3d 500.

Construction and operation of statute restricting corporation's right to purchase its own stock by requiring purchase to be made out of surplus, 61 ALR3d 1049.

Causation in private civil actions by minority shareholders under proxy provisions of § 14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USCS § 78n(a)) and Securities Exchange Act (SEC) Rules thereunder — post Virginia Bankshares, 137 ALR Fed 293.